en: Goat's Haymilk
de: Ziegen-Heumilch
es: Leche de heno de cabra
fr: Lait de foin de chèvre
hr: Kozje mlijeko od sijena
it: Latte fieno di capra

en: Sheep milks, Sheep milk, Ewe milk, Ewes milk, Sheep's milks, Sheep's milk, Whole sheep milk
bg: Овче мляко
de: Schafsmilch
es: Leche de oveja
fr: Laits de brebis, Lait de brebis, Lait de brebis entier
hr: Ovčjeg mlijeka
lt: Avių pienas
nl: Schapenmelk
pt: Leites de ovelha
sv: Fårmjölk

en: Sheep's Haymilk
de: Schaf-Heumilch
es: Leche de heno de oveja
fr: Lait de foin de brebis
hr: Ovčje sijeno
it: Latte fieno di pecora

en: Mare's milk
fr: Lait de jument

en: Whole mare's milk
fr: Lait de jument entier

en: Buffalo milks, Buffalo milk
fr: Lait de bufflonne

en: Toned milks, Toned milk
fr: Lait de bufflonne tonique, lait de bufflonne tonifié

en: Double-toned milks, Double-toned milk
fr: Lait de bufflonne très tonique, lait de bufflonne très tonifié

en: Pasteurized buffalo milks, Pasteurized buffalo milk
fr: Lait de bufflonne pasteurisé

en: Semi-skimmed UHT Buffalo milks, Semi-skimmed UHT Buffalo milk
fr: Lait de bufflonne demi-écrémé UHT

en: Skimmed UHT Buffalo milks
fr: Lait de bufflonne écrémé UHT

en: UHT buffalo milks
fr: Lait de bufflonne UHT

en: Skimmed milks
bg: Обезмаслено мляко
ca: Llet desnatada
de: Entrahmte Milch, Entrahmte Milche, Entrahmte Milchen, Magermilch, Magermilche, Magermilchen
es: Leche desnatada
fi: rasvattomat maidot
fr: Laits écrémés, lait écrémé
hr: Obrana mlijeka
it: Latte scremato
lt: Nugriebtas pienas
nl: Magere melken
pt: Leites desnatados, leite desnatado
ru: Обезжиреное молоко
tr: Yağsız veya az yağlı süt

en: UHT Skimmed milks
bg: Обезмаслено хомогенизирано мляко
fr: Laits écrémés UHT

en: Pasteurised skimmed milk
bg: Пастьоризирано обезмаслено прясно мляко
fr: Laits écrémés pasteurisés
hr: Pasterizirano obrano mlijeko

en: Milk powders
bg: Мляко на прах
ca: Llet en pols
de: Milchpulver, Trockenmilchpulver
es: Leche en polvo
fi: maitojauheet
fr: Laits en poudre, farines de lait, laits déshydratés, poudre de lait
hr: Mlijeko u prahu
it: Latte in polvere
lt: Pieno milteliai
nl: Melkpoeders
pl: Mleko w proszku
sv: Mjölkpulver
tr: Süt tozu

en: Milk-shakes preparations
fr: Préparations pour Milk-shakes

en: Whole milk powder
bg: Пълномаслено мляко на прах
fr: Laits entiers en poudre
hr: Punomasno mlijeko u prahu
lt: Nenugriebto pieno milteliai

en: Semi-skimmed milk powder
bg: Полуобезмаслено мляко на прах
fr: Laits en poudre demi-écrémés

en: Skimmed milk powder
bg: Обезмаслено мляко на прах
fr: Laits en poudre écrémés